Nebraska, session 109, LB873A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB873A LB873A
2026 2026
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $734,591 from the
General Fund for FY2026-27 and (2) $377,923 from the General Fund for
FY2027-28 to the Department of Revenue, for Program 102, to aid in
carrying out the provisions of Legislative Bill 873, One Hundred Ninth
Legislature, Second Session, 2026.
Total expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per
diems from funds appropriated in this section shall not exceed $268,000
for FY2026-27 or $276,200 for FY2027-28.
-2-